Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 5 Compensation and Benefits
21-5-209. Compensation plan.

There is established for state agencies covered by this subchapter a compensation plan for the setting of salaries and salary increases, when deserved, of all employees serving in positions covered by this subchapter.

(1)No employee shall be paid at a rate of pay higher than the maximum pay level in the grade assigned to his or her class unless otherwise provided for in this subchapter.

However, an employee presently employed in a position who is being paid at a rate in excess of the maximum for his or her assigned grade may continue to receive his or her rate of pay.

It is the specific intent of the General Assembly to authorize, in the enactment of the compensation plans, rates of pay for each of the appropriate grades assigned to a class, but it is not the intent that any pay increases shall be automatic or that any employee shall have a claim or a right to pay increases unless the department head of the state agency determines that the employee, by experience, ability, and work performance, is eligible for the increase in pay authorized for the appropriate rate.

GENERAL SALARIES MW $17,680 $19,760 $21,840 GS1 $22,000 $26,950 $31,900 GS2 $23,335 $28,585 $33,836 GS3 $26,034 $31,892 $37,749 GS4 $29,046 $35,581 $42,117 GS5 $32,405 $39,696 $46,987 GS6 $36,155 $44,290 $52,425 GS7 $40,340 $49,417 $58,493 GS8 $45,010 $55,137 $65,265 GS9 $50,222 $61,522 $72,822 GS10 $56,039 $68,648 $81,257 GS11 $62,531 $76,600 $90,670 GS12 $69,776 $85,476 $101,175 GS13 $77,862 $95,381 $112,900 GS14 $86,887 $106,437 $125,986 GS15 $96,960 $118,776 $140,592

Click to view table.

INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SALARIES IT1 $33,403 $40,919 $48,434 IT2 $37,266 $45,651 $54,035 IT3 $41,578 $50,933 $60,288 IT4 $46,391 $56,829 $67,267 IT5 $51,762 $63,408 $75,054 IT6 $57,755 $70,750 $83,745 IT7 $64,445 $78,945 $93,445 IT8 $71,704 $87,837 $103,970 IT9 $80,242 $98,297 $116,351 IT10 $89,541 $109,688 $129,835 IT11 $99,920 $122,402 $144,884 IT12 $111,504 $136,592 $161,681

Click to view table.

MEDICAL PROFESSIONAL SALARIES MP1 $63,830 $75,958 $88,058 MP2 $71,403 $85,683 $99,964 MP3 $79,879 $96,654 $113,428 MP4 $89,368 $109,029 $128,690 MP5 $99,991 $122,989 $145,987 MP6 $111,884 $138,736 $165,588 MP7 $125,200 $156,500 $187,800 MP8 $140,109 $176,537 $212,966 MP9 $156,804 $199,140 $241,478 MP10 $175,620 $224,033 $270,455

Click to view table.

SENIOR EXECUTIVE SALARIES SE1 $108,110 $127,655 $147,200 SE2 $120,543 $138,822 $157,100 SE3 $134,406 $150,703 $167,000 SE4 $149,862 $165,681 $181,500 SE5 $167,096 $184,398 $201,700

Click to view table.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 199, § 5; 1971, No. 749, § 1; 1973, No. 286, §§ 1, 2; 1974 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 39, § 1; 1975, No. 932, § 2; 1977, No. 289, § 1; 1979, No. 3, § 1; 1981, No. 19, § 1; 1983, No. 68, § 1; 1985, No. 101, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-3205, 12-3205n; Acts 1989, No. 793, § 8; 1991, No. 452, § 1; 1991, No. 1148, §§ 4, 14; 1993, No. 770, § 1; 1995, No. 992, § 1; 1997, No. 532, § 1; 1999, No. 813, § 1; 2001, No. 1461, § 3; 2003 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 22, § 1; 2005, No. 2198, § 1; 2007, No. 375, § 1; 2009, No. 688, § 7; 2017, No. 365, § 14.

21-5-210. Implementation of plan — Changes in class specifications.

For the purposes of implementing the uniform employee classification and compensation plan for the respective agencies covered by this subchapter, the General Assembly determines that the class specifications prepared by the Office of Personnel Management in classifying the various positions authorized in the respective appropriation acts shall be the class specifications to be followed in implementing the respective appropriations for all part-time and full-time employees of the respective agencies covered by this subchapter.

Changes in class specifications may be made in whole or in part by the Office of Personnel Management.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 199, § 3; 1971, No. 750, § 1; 1973, No. 873, § 2; 1979, No. 828, § 1; 1981, No. 650, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3203; Acts 1989, No. 793, § 9; 2001, No. 1461, § 4; 2009, No. 688, § 8; 2017, No. 365, § 15.

21-5-211. Implementation procedure for grade changes — Salary adjustments.

The Office of Personnel Management has administrative responsibility for enforcing compliance by state agencies affected by this subchapter in implementing classification and grade changes.

(1)The Governor may authorize a salary increase up to two percent (2%) each fiscal year if:

The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services determine that sufficient general revenues become available; and

The salary increase does not result in an employee's compensation exceeding the maximum pay level amount set out for the position.

(A)An employee compensated at the highest pay level rate authorized for his or her classification is eligible to receive the salary increase authorized in this section as a lump-sum payment.

However, the increase shall be paid as a lump sum on the last pay period of the fiscal year of the year in which the increase is to occur, and the payment shall not be construed as exceeding the maximum salary.

(1)If the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and the secretary determine that general revenue funds are insufficient to implement the salary increases authorized in this subchapter or by any other law that affects salary increases for state employees, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and the secretary upon approval by the Governor may reduce the percentage of all authorized salary increases for all state employees covered by this subchapter without regard to whether or not the employees are compensated from general or special revenues, federal funds, or trust funds.

However, if sufficient general revenues should then become available at any time during the year to provide the maximum additional salary increases for all state employees without regard to the source of revenues, salary increases for state employees provided for in this subchapter or by any other law may be fully implemented by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and the secretary.

Any salary adjustments made by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and the secretary in accordance with this subsection shall be reported to the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

All percentage calculations stipulated in this subchapter or any other law affecting salaries of state employees may be rounded to the nearest even-dollar amount by the Office of Personnel Management when making the percentage changes to state employee salaries.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 199, § 7; 1971, No. 749, § 2; 1973, No. 873, § 7; 1974 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 39, §§ 3, 4; 1975, No. 932, § 4; 1979, No. 828, § 4; 1981, No. 650, § 4; 1985, No. 981, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3207; Acts 1989, No. 793, § 10; 1991, No. 1148, §§ 5, 6; 1993, No. 770, §§ 2-4; 1995, No. 992, §§ 2, 3; 1997, No. 532, § 2; 1997, No. 899, § 10; 1999, No. 1019, § 3; 2001, No. 1461, § 5; 2003 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 22, § 2; 2005, No. 2198, § 2; 2007, No. 375, § 2; 2009, No. 688, § 9; 2011, No. 1017, § 3; 2013, No. 1321, § 2; 2014, No. 285, § 81; 2015, No. 1007, §§ 3-5; 2017, No. 365, § 16; 2019, No. 910, §§
6125, 6126; 2019, No. 981, § 5.

21-5-212. [Repealed.]

21-5-214. New appointments and other compensation plan provisions.

A new appointment to a position in a state agency covered by this subchapter shall be paid at the entry pay level for the grade assigned to the classification unless otherwise authorized by law.

Special rates of pay may be established for either classifications or positions for the following reasons:

(1)A state agency may request a special rate of pay for a specific classification or position due to prevailing market rates of pay up to the midpoint pay level of the appropriate grade of a classification on the appropriate pay table for the assigned grade with the written approval of the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services.

A state agency may request a special rate of pay for a specific classification or position due to prevailing market rates of pay up to the maximum pay level for the assigned grade only with the approval of the secretary after review by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

The Office of Personnel Management shall maintain a register of classifications or positions for which special rates of pay have been established due to prevailing market rates of pay.

The office shall file a report of special rates of pay established due to prevailing market rates of pay with the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, at the next regularly scheduled meeting following the approval.

(1)A special rate of pay may be established for an exceptionally well-qualified applicant whose educational background or experience qualifies the applicant to perform the job with little or substantially less orientation and training than would be required for another qualified applicant.

(A)An agency director may approve a special rate of pay under subdivision (d)(1) of this section up to fifteen percent (15%) above the entry pay level for the grade assigned to the classification and shall report all actions under the office’s procedures.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 199, § 7; 1969, No. 663, § 1; 1971, No. 749, § 2; 1973, No. 873, § 7; 1975, No. 932, § 4; 1979, No. 828, § 4; 1981, No. 650, § 4; 1985, No. 981, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3207; Acts 1989, No. 793, § 13; 1991, No. 1148, §§ 8-11; 1995, No. 992, § 4; 2001, No. 963, § 1; 2001, No. 1461, § 7; 2005, No. 2198, § 3; 2009, No. 688, § 11; 2011, No. 1017, § 5; 2013, No. 1321, § 3; 2017, No. 365, § 18; 2019, No. 910, §§
6127-6130.

21-5-215. [Repealed.]

21-5-217. [Repealed.]

Whereas Arkansas Rehabilitation Services currently purchases and sells staff interpreter services for the deaf with four (4) other agencies, the University of Arkansas at Fayetteville, the University of Arkansas at Little Rock, the Arkansas School for the Deaf, and the Administrative Office of the Courts and whereas the need for interpreters is immediate and often for crisis purposes and cannot be planned ahead, the Division of Workforce Services is authorized to arrange for reimbursement with those agencies, assuring that the amount paid from both agencies will not exceed the maximum for the grades they occupy consistent with the intent of §19-4-1604, with notification and justification to the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services.

History.

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 202, § 9; 2019, No. 910, § 569.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Former §21-5-218, concerning reimbursement for interpreter services for the deaf, is deemed to be superseded by this section. The former section was derived from Acts 1987, No. 1050, § 10.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Arkansas Rehabilitation Services” for “the Arkansas Rehabilitation Services of the Department of Career Education”; substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Career Education”; and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Chief Fiscal Officer of the State”.

Cross References. Court interpreters, §16-10-1101 et seq.

21-5-219. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning nonclassified employees, was repealed by Acts 2015, No. 1007, § 6.This section was derived from Acts 1997, No. 532, § 3; 1999, No. 1019, § 4; 2001, No. 1461, § 11; 2003 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 22, § 3; 2009, No. 688, § 12; 2011, No. 1017, § 6.

21-5-220. Shift differential.

Upon the approval of the Office of Personnel Management, an employee whose working hours do not conform to normal state business hours shall be eligible for additional compensation up to twelve percent (12%) of the hourly rate for which he or she is eligible under this subchapter as a shift differential if:

The state agency routinely schedules more than one (1) work shift per day;

The shift to which the employee is assigned is a full work shift; and

The employee is regularly assigned to the late shift or is assigned to the shift on a regularly scheduled rotating basis.

An employee assigned to an evening shift shall not receive additional compensation that exceeds six percent (6%) above that for which he or she is eligible under this subchapter.

An employee assigned to a night shift shall not receive additional compensation that exceeds twelve percent (12%) above that for which he or she is eligible under this subchapter.

An employee at or near the maximum authorized salary level for the grade assigned to his or her classification may be compensated at an additional rate not to exceed twelve percent (12%) of his or her eligible salary under this subchapter.

In those instances in which the granting of the additional compensation has the effect of temporarily exceeding the maximum annual rate for the grade assigned to the employee's classification, the additional compensation shall not be considered as exceeding the maximum allowable rate for that grade.

A person employed in areas providing critical support, custody, and care to designated client service units at state-operated inpatient hospital facilities, at state-operated human development centers, and at maximum security units at correctional facilities during weekend hours is eligible to receive up to twenty percent (20%) of the hourly rate for which he or she is eligible under this subchapter paid as a shift or weekend differential.

A person employed in an area not providing critical care during weekend hours is eligible to receive up to fifteen percent (15%) of the hourly rate for which he or she is eligible under this subchapter paid as a shift or weekend differential.

Designated weekend hours begin no earlier than 2:30 p.m. on Friday and end no later than 8:00 a.m. on the following Monday.

If a facility uses shifts other than traditional eight-hour shifts, a shift differential may be paid for those shifts exceeding the normal day shift of the facility.

If shift and weekend differentials are provided to an employee, the total compensation may exceed the maximum annual rate for the assigned pay grade for those positions included in this subchapter.

The state agency shall identify the shifts, job classifications, and positions to be eligible for the shift differential and the differential percentage for which each classification is eligible within each shift.

The shift schedule, job classifications, positions, and the percentage of shift differential for which the job titles will be eligible shall be submitted to the Office of Personnel Management for approval by the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services.

Subsequent changes to the shift schedule, job classifications, positions, and shift differential percentages shall be submitted to the Office of Personnel Management and receive prior approval by the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services.

An employee who is receiving additional compensation under this section and then is reassigned to a normal shift shall revert on the day of the reassignment to the rate of pay for which he or she is eligible under this subchapter.

The Office of Personnel Management shall report all shift differential approvals to the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment added “work shift; and” in (a)(1)(B); deleted (a)(1)(B)(i) and (ii); substituted “shall” for “may” in (a)(2) and (3); and substituted“Subcommittee” for “Committee” in (e).

The 2017 amendment substituted “The state agency” for “The agency or institution” in (a)(1)(A); redesignated former (b)(1) as (b)(1)(A) and added (b)(1)(B); substituted “The state agency” for “The agency or institution” in (c)(3)(A); substituted “Office of Personnel Management” for “office” in (c)(3)(B); inserted “be submitted to the Office of Personnel Management and” in (c)(3)(C); and, in (e), substituted “The Office of Personnel Management” for “The office”, deleted “Personnel Subcommittee of” preceding “the Legislative Council”, and added “or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Chief Fiscal Officer of the State” in (c)(3)(B) and (c)(3)(C).

An employee who is receiving additional compensation for hazardous duty and then is reassigned to normal duty shall revert on the day of the reassignment to the rate of pay for which he or she is eligible under this subchapter.

A professional certification differential of up to ten percent (10%) for job-related professional certifications for individual positions or for specific classifications within a state agency may be authorized if the certification is:

From a recognized professional certifying organization and is determined to be directly related to the predominant purpose and use of the position or classification; and

Not included as a minimum qualification established or as a special requirement for the classification by the official class specification.

A professional certification differential may be paid only while the certification is current and maintained by the employee and while employed in a position or classification covered by the plan.

Documentation of continuation or renewal of the certification of the employee is required for continuation of the certification differential.

An education differential of up to ten percent (10%) for job-related education for individual positions or for specific classifications within a state agency may be authorized if:

Attainment of additional education is from an accredited institution of higher education, documented by official transcript, certificate, or degree award, and directly related to the predominant purpose and use of the position or classification; and

The education to be compensated is not included as a special requirement or minimum qualification established for the classification by the official class specification.

A geographic area differential of up to ten percent (10%) may be authorized to address the documented inability to recruit and retain certain employees in a specific geographic area of the state if the additional geographic area differential is based on documented recruitment, turnover, or other competitive pay issue in a specific geographic area but that does not justify a statewide labor market special entry rate.

A second-language differential of up to ten percent (10%) may be authorized for an employee who has the demonstrated ability and skill to communicate in a language other than English, including American Sign Language, and that skill is determined by the state agency to be directly related to the effective performance of the job duties for the position occupied by the employee.

An employee who receives additional compensation under this section and who moves into a position that does not need the skill to communicate in a language other than English shall revert on the effective date of the change to the rate of pay that the employee would otherwise receive.

On-call duty or standby-duty differential may be authorized for an employee whose job requires him or her to provide services on nights, weekends, or holidays or other situations when the state agency does not have regularly scheduled staff coverage.

On-call duty or standby-duty differential is to be used for officially scheduled duty outside regular work hours during which an employee is required to be accessible by telephone, pager, or other means and must return to the designated work site upon notification of need within a specified response time.

An employee who is required to be available for duty on nights, weekends, and holidays will be eligible to receive on-call or standby-duty pay equivalent of an hourly rate not to exceed twenty percent (20%) of his or her base hourly pay rate for each on-call or standby hour for not more than forty-eight (48) hours during any seven-day work period.

Compensation shall not be paid to any employee required to be on-call and standby who fails to respond after the second notification that his or her services are needed.

If the equipment or paging device malfunctions, the penalty shall not apply.

An employee on on-call or standby duty who is called in to work shall be compensated for the actual hours worked at the appropriate rate of pay with a minimum of two (2) hours for each call back.

The employee shall not be paid on-call or standby pay for hours actually worked during a call back.

If granting additional compensation would have the effect of exceeding the maximum pay level for the grade assigned to the employee's classification, the additional compensation shall not be considered as exceeding the maximum allowable rate for that grade.

Other compensation differentials may be administered by the Office of Personnel Management after:

Approval by the State Personnel Administrator; and

Review by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2016, No. 231, § 43, provided: “ON-CALL COMPENSATION. On-call duty or standby duty differential may be authorized for a Classified or Non-Classified patient care employee whose job requires him or her to provide services when there is no regularly scheduled staff coverage. An employee shall not exceed 128 hours during any seven-day period, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate compensation.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Amendments. The 2013 amendment deleted former (d), (f), (l)(2), (m)(3)(D), inserted present (l) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; and inserted “of the Division of Management Services of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Personnel Management” in (b)(1)(D).

The 2017 amendment substituted “state agency” for “state agency or institution” and for “agency or institution” and made similar changes throughout the section; substituted “Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee” for “Personnel Subcommittee of theLegislative Council” throughout the section; inserted “to the Office of Personnel Management” in (b)(1)(B); substituted “ten percent (10%)” for “six percent (6%)” in (c)(1), (e), (g)(1), (h), and (i); substituted “Office of Personnel Management” for “office” in (c)(2)(B); deleted “or the career” preceding “pay level” in (l); added (m); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment inserted “the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services in consultation with” in (c)(2)(B); and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Chief Fiscal Officer of the State” in (c)(2)(C) and (d).

State agency has documented the need for a salary administration grid for specified positions or classifications;

Terms and conditions of a grid proposed by the state agency address the needs of the targeted positions;

Cost of implementing and maintaining a salary administration grid is within the state agency's existing appropriation and the implementation does not use funds specifically set aside for other programs within the state agency;

Salary administration grid has been submitted to the Office of Personnel Management for approval by the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services up to the midpoint pay level; and

Salary administration grid has been submitted to the Office of Personnel Management for approval by the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services above the midpoint pay level.

The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services shall not approve the salary administration grid in this subdivision (a)(1)(E) until the salary administration grid has been reviewed by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

An approved salary administration grid shall be used for establishing a starting salary for an employee in an individual position.

A person hired above the entry pay level shall meet or exceed the minimum qualifications for the job classification.

Subsequent salary determinations within a salary administration grid shall be based on the employee's qualifications, relevant competitive compensation rates, professional or education achievements, and internal equity within the state agency.

A plan of implementation and salary progression shall be approved by the Office of Personnel Management on a biennial basis.

An approved grid may be amended only upon approval by the Office of Personnel Management after review by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

Compensation differentials that are included in a state agency's grid plan shall not exceed rates provided in § 21-5-221.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “state agency” for “state agency or institution” and for “agency or institution” and made similar changes throughout the section; substituted “Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee” for “Personnel Subcommittee of theLegislative Council” throughout the section; substituted “Office of Personnel Management” for “office” in (a)(3) and (b)(3); substituted “or positions” for “of positions assigned to the career service compensation plan” in the introductory language of (a)(1); rewrote (a)(1)(D); added (a)(1)(E); deleted “the classification of a career service position” following “assigned” in (a)(2)(A); substituted “establish policies and procedures” for “promulgate rules” in (b)(3); added (c); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Chief Fiscal Officer of the State” in (a)(1)(D) and twice in (a)(1)(E).

Amendments. The 2017 amendment redesignated former (a) through (d) as (a)(1) through (a)(4); in (a)(1), substituted “agency director” for “agency or institution director” twice, substituted “state agency” for “agency or institution”, and inserted “state” preceding “agency, or the”; substituted “The severance payments under subdivision (a)(1) of this section” for “These payments” in (a)(2); inserted “under subdivision (a)(1) of this section” in (a)(3); in (a)(4), deleted “or institution” following “agency” and substituted “Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee” for “Personnel Subcommittee of the Legislative Council”; and added present (b).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Chief Fiscal Officer of the State” in the introductory language of (a)(1); and substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” in the introductory language of (b)(1).

Amendments. The 2011 amendment inserted “classification or a professional and executive” in (a)(1).

The 2013 amendment substituted “21-5-214” for “21-5-214(a)(1)” in (b)(4).

The 2017 amendment, in (a)(1), substituted “a state agency” for “an agency or institution” and “classification by the agency” for “career service classification or a professional and executive classification by the agency or institution”; in (a)(3), substituted “state agencies shall not” for “agencies may not” and “one thousand five hundred (1,500)” for “one thousand (1,000)”; deleted (a)(4); substituted “determined in the same manner as established for newly hired employees” for “established at the minimum entrance rate of pay for the grade of the assigned classification with the following exceptions” in the former introductory language of (b); deleted (b)(1) through (b)(4); and, in (c), deleted “institution” following “agency” and added “and as authorized by the Office of Personnel Management”.

If the new classifications are necessary for any of these additional positions, the Office of Personnel Management may assign the appropriate title and grade after review by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

If a state agency requests any central growth pool position to be continued during the subsequent fiscal year, the position shall be requested as a new position in the state agency's subsequent fiscal year budget request.

Elected constitutional officers of this state;

The General Assembly, including employees of the Bureau of Legislative Research and Arkansas Legislative Audit;

Members of the Supreme Court, the Court of Appeals, circuit courts, prosecuting attorneys, and the Administrative Office of the Courts;

The Arkansas Department of Transportation;

Federal military technicians, military training support personnel, federally funded personnel of the Arkansas National Guard, and other military personnel who are paid directly by the federal government; and

The Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission.

(A)If one of the entities provided in subdivision (e)(1) of this section does not have sufficient positions available with the appropriate classification and grade to meet an agency's mandated responsibilities and the positions were not anticipated at the time of the passage of the agency's operating appropriation act, the positions may be used, after review by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

The entities provided in subdivision (e)(1) of this section shall provide justification for the request to allocate a position from the growth pool to the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

If a new classification is necessary for an additional position, the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, may assign the appropriate title and grade.

If an agency requests an approved growth pool position to be continued during the subsequent fiscal year, the position shall be requested as a new position in the agency's subsequent fiscal year budget request.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment repealed former (d).

The 2017 amendment substituted “state agency” for “state agency or institution” and for “agency” and made similar changes throughout the section; substituted “Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee” for “Personnel Subcommittee of theLegislative Council” throughout the section; substituted “Office of Personnel Management” for “office” in present (a)(3) and throughout the rest of the section; in (a)(1), substituted “one thousand (1,000) positions” for “two hundred fifty (250) career service positions at grade C130 and one hundred fifty (150) professional and executive positions at grade N922”; deleted former (a)(2) and (a)(5), and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; in (b)(1), substituted “two hundred (200) positions” for “two hundred (200) career service positions at grade C130 and one hundred (100) professional and executive positions atgrade N922”; deleted former (b)(3), and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; in (c)(1), substituted “fifty (50) positions” for “twenty-five (25) career service positions at grade C130 and twenty-five (25) professional and executive positions at grade N922”; rewrote (c)(3); added (d) and (e); and made stylistic changes.

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning supplemental personal services, was repealed by Acts 2011, No. 1116, § 1. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

21-5-301. Acts 1977, No. 673, § 5; 1981, No. 741, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3209n.

21-5-302. Acts 1977, No. 673, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3209.

21-5-303. Acts 1977, No. 673, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3209n.

21-5-304. Acts 1977, No. 673, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3209n.

21-5-305. Acts 1977, No. 673, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3209n.

21-5-306. Acts 1977, No. 673, § 5; 1981, No. 741, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3209n.

21-5-307. Acts 1977, No. 673, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3209n.

21-5-308. Acts 1977, No. 673, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3209n.

21-5-309. Acts 1977, No. 673, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3209n.